Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 190 Motor Vehicle Sales
190.043.
Refusal of manufacturer or distributor to honor succession.

If a manufacturer or distributor believes that good cause exists for refusing to honor the succession to the ownership of a new motor vehicle dealership by a family member of a deceased or incapacitated owner of a new motor vehicle dealership under the existing franchise agreement, the manufacturer or distributor may, not more than sixty (60) days following the receipt of:

Notice of the designated family member’s intent to succeed to the ownership of the new motor vehicle dealership; or

Any personal or financial data which it has requested;

serve upon the designated family member and the commission, notice of its refusal to honor the succession and its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the dealer no sooner than ninety (90) days from the date such notice is served.

The notice provided in subsection (1) of this section must state the specific grounds for the refusal to honor the succession and of its intent to discontinue the existing franchise with the new motor vehicle dealer no sooner than ninety (90) days from the date such notice is served.

If notice of refusal and discontinuance as provided in subsection (1) of this section is not timely served upon the family member, the franchise shall continue in effect subject to termination only as otherwise permitted by KRS

190.045

.

In determining whether good cause for the refusal to honor the succession exists, the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or importer has the burden of proving before the commission that the successor is a person who is not of good moral character or does not meet the franchisor’s existing and reasonable standards, and considering the volume of sales and service of the new motor vehicle dealership, the uniformly applied business experience standards in the market area.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 373, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 111, § 4, effective July 15, 1996.

190.045.
Cancellation, termination, refusal to renew franchise — Notice — Duty of manufacturer.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise or notwithstanding the terms or provisions of any waiver, a manufacturer shall not cancel, terminate, or fail to renew any franchise with a licensed new motor vehicle dealer unless the manufacturer has:

Satisfied the notice requirement of subsection (4) of this section;

Has good cause for cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal;

Has acted in good faith as defined in KRS 190.010(22); and

Has established the requirements of this subsection in proceedings before the licensor if the action is protested by the new motor vehicle dealer within fifteen (15) days after receiving notice of the cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal.

When a protest is filed, the licensor shall inform the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative that a timely protest has been filed and that the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative shall not cancel, terminate, or fail to renew any franchise with the licensed new motor vehicle dealer until the licensor has held a hearing and the licensor has determined that the manufacturer has met its burden under this section.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise or the terms or provisions of any waiver, good cause shall exist for the purposes of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal when:

There is a failure by the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise which provision is both reasonable and of material significance to the franchise relationship, provided that the dealer has been notified in writing of the failure within one hundred eighty (180) days after the manufacturer first acquired knowledge of the failure.

If the failure by the new motor vehicle dealer, defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, relates to the performance of the new motor vehicle dealer in sales or service, then good cause shall be defined as the failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with reasonable performance criteria established by the manufacturer, if the new motor vehicle dealer was apprised by the manufacturer in writing of a failure, and

The notification stated that notice was provided of failure of performance pursuant to this section;

The new motor vehicle dealer was afforded a reasonable opportunity, for a period of not less than six (6) months, to comply with the criteria; and

The new motor vehicle dealer did not demonstrate substantial progress toward compliance with the manufacturer’s performance criteria during the designated period.

The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof under this section.

Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise prior to the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of any franchise, the manufacturer shall furnish notification of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal to the new motor vehicle dealer as follows:

In the manner described in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and

In not less than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the termination, cancellation or nonrenewal; or

In not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the effective date of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal with respect to any of the following:

Insolvency of the new motor vehicle dealer, or filing of any petition by or against the new motor vehicle dealer under any bankruptcy or receivership law;

Failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations during its customary business hours for seven (7) consecutive business days, except for acts of God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the new motor vehicle dealer;

Fraudulent misrepresentation by the new motor vehicle dealer to the manufacturer or distributor which is material to the franchise;

Conviction of the new motor vehicle dealer, or any owner or operator thereof, of any felony which is punishable by imprisonment; or

Revocation of any license which the new motor vehicle dealer is required to have to operate a dealership;

In not less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the effective date of a termination or cancellation where the manufacturer or distributor is discontinuing the sale of the product line.

Notification under this section shall be in writing by certified mail or personally delivered to the new motor vehicle dealer; and shall contain:

A statement of intent to terminate, cancel, or not to renew the franchise; and

A statement of the reasons for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; and

The date on which the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal takes effect.

Upon the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of any franchise, pursuant to this section, the new motor vehicle dealer shall be allowed fair and reasonable compensation by the manufacturer for the:

New current model year motor vehicle inventory which has been acquired from the manufacturer, and which has not been damaged or altered while in the dealer’s possession;

Supplies and parts which have been acquired from the manufacturer;

Equipment and furnishings provided the new motor vehicle dealer purchased from the manufacturer or its approved sources; and

Special tools.

Fair and reasonable compensation shall be paid by the manufacturer within ninety (90) days of the effective date of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, provided the new motor vehicle dealer has clear title to the inventory and other items and is in a position to convey that title to the manufacturer.

In the event of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal under this section, and the new motor vehicle dealer is leasing the dealership facilities from a lessor other than the manufacturer, or owns the dealership facilities, the manufacturer shall pay a reasonable rent to the dealer in accordance with and subject to subsection (8) of this section.

Reasonable rental value shall be paid only to the extent the dealership premises are recognized in the franchise and only if they are:

Used solely for performance in accordance with the franchise; and

Not substantially in excess of those facilities recommended by the manufacturer.

If the facilities are owned by the dealer, the manufacturer will either:

Locate a purchaser who will offer to purchase the dealership facilities at a reasonable price; or

Locate a lessee who will offer to lease the premises for a reasonable term at a reasonable rent; or

Failing the foregoing, lease the dealership facilities at a reasonable rental value for one (1) year.

If the facilities are leased by the dealer, the manufacturer will either:

Locate a tenant or tenants satisfactory to the lessor, who will sublet or assume the balance of the lease; or

Arrange with the lessor for the cancellation of the lease without penalty to the dealer; or

Failing the foregoing, lease the dealership facilities at a reasonable rent for one (1) year.

The manufacturer shall not be obligated to provide assistance under this section if the dealer:

Fails to accept a bona fide offer from a prospective purchaser, sublessee or assignee; or

Refuses to execute a settlement agreement with the lessor if the agreement would be without cost to the dealer; or

Fails to make a written request for assistance under this section within one (1) month of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.

If, in an action for damages under this section, the manufacturer or distributor fails to prove either that the manufacturer or distributor has acted in good faith or that there was good cause for the franchise termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, then the manufacturer or distributor may terminate, cancel, or fail to renew the franchise upon payment to the new motor vehicle dealer of an amount equal to the value of the dealership as an ongoing business location.

Notice of termination to a dealer shall entitle the dealer to continue the franchise and the dealer may attempt to sell the franchise until all of the dealer’s appeal rights have been exhausted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 75, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1982, ch. 373, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 111, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 23, § 3, effective February 22, 2000.

190.0451.
New motor vehicle dealer license — Prohibition against licensing new dealer after prior dealer’s franchise has been revoked — Exceptions — Ten year duration of prohibition.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if a dealer licensed under this chapter has its franchise revoked by the manufacturer on or after January 1, 2009, for grounds other than those provided in KRS Chapter 190, the commission shall not grant a new motor vehicle dealer license establishing a new motor vehicle dealership, or relocating an existing new motor vehicle dealership, within a ten (10) mile radius of a location at which a former licensed new motor vehicle dealer for the same line make of new motor vehicles had its franchise revoked.

If the manufacturer can show proof that the franchise was offered to the original franchisee at substantially similar terms as offered to other potential buyers, and the original franchisee refused the offer, then the prohibition in subsection (1) of this section shall not apply and the commission may grant a new motor vehicle dealer license within the ten (10) mile radius described in subsection (1) of this section.

The prohibition against granting a new motor vehicle dealer license outlined in subsection (1) of this section shall remain in effect for ten (10) years from the date of revocation of the original franchise by the manufacturer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

190.046.
Compensation to dealer for work performed under warranty — “Reasonable compensation” — Submission, determination, and payment of dealer’s claims — Compensation to dealer for sponsored sales or service promotion events — Audits — Fraud.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, each motor vehicle manufacturer or distributor, doing business within this Commonwealth, shall assume all responsibility for and shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless its motor vehicle dealers against any loss, damages, and expenses, including legal costs, arising out of complaints, claims, recall repairs or modifications or factory authorized or directed repairs, or lawsuits resulting from warranty defects, which shall include structural or production defects; defects in the assembly; or design of motor vehicles, parts, accessories; or other functions beyond the control of the dealer, including without limitation, the selection of parts or components for the vehicle. Each manufacturer or distributor shall pay reasonable compensation to any authorized dealer who performs work to repair defects, or to repair any damage to the manufacturer’s or distributor’s product sustained while the product is in transit to the dealer, when the carrier or the means of transportation is designated by the manufacturer or distributor. Each manufacturer or distributor shall provide to its dealers with each model year a schedule of time allowances for the performance of warranty repair work and services, which shall include time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of warranty work and service time, and shall be reasonable and adequate for the work to be performed.

In the determination of what constitutes “reasonable compensation” under this section, the principal factor to be considered shall be the amount of money that the dealer is charging its other customers for the same type service or repair work. Other factors may be considered, including the compensation being paid by other manufacturers or distributors to their dealers for work; and the prevailing amount of money being paid or charged by the dealers in the city or community in which the authorized dealer is doing business. “Reasonable compensation” shall include diagnosing the defect; repair service; labor; parts and administrative and clerical costs. The compensation of a dealer shall not be less than the amount charged by the dealer for like services and parts, which minimum compensation for parts shall be dealer cost plus thirty percent (30%) gross profit, to retail customers for nonwarranty service and repairs, or less than the amounts indicated for work on the schedule of warranty compensation required to be filed by the manufacturer with the commission as a part of the manufacturer’s license application by KRS

190.030

. A manufacturer or distributor shall not require unreasonable proof to establish “reasonable compensation.”

A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a dealer to submit a claim authorized under this section sooner than thirty (30) days after the dealer completes the preparation, delivery, or warranty service authorizing the claim for preparation, delivery, or warranty service.

All claims made by a dealer under this section shall be paid within thirty (30) days after their approval.

All claims shall be either approved or disapproved by the manufacturer or distributor within thirty (30) days after their receipt on a completed form supplied or approved by the manufacturer or distributor.

Any claims not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days after the receipt of the form shall be considered to be approved and payment shall be made within thirty (30) days thereafter.

A dealer shall not be required to maintain defective parts for more than thirty (30) days after payment of a claim.

Any dispute between the dealer and the manufacturer or distributor shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

190.057

.

A manufacturer or distributor shall compensate the dealer for manufacturer-sponsored or distributor-sponsored sales or service promotion events, including but not limited to rebates, programs, or activities in accordance with established written guidelines for such events, programs, or activities, which the manufacturer or distributor shall provide to each dealer.

A manufacturer or distributor shall not require a dealer to submit a claim authorized under subsection (4) of this section sooner than thirty (30) days after the dealer becomes eligible to submit the claim.

All claims made by a dealer pursuant to subsection (4) of this section for promotion events, including but not limited to rebates, programs, or activities, shall be paid within thirty (30) days after their approval.

All claims shall be either approved or disapproved by the manufacturer or distributor within thirty (30) days after their receipt on a completed form supplied or approved by the manufacturer or distributor.

Any claim not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty (30) days after the receipt of this form shall be considered to be approved and payment shall be made within thirty (30) days.

If a dealer submits any claim under this section to a manufacturer or distributor that is incomplete, inaccurate, or lacking any information usually required by the manufacturer or distributor, or if incomplete, inaccurate, or missing information is discovered during an audit, then the manufacturer or distributor shall promptly notify the dealer, and the time limit to submit the claim shall be extended for a reasonable length of time, not less than five (5) business days following notice by the manufacturer or distributor to the dealer, for the dealer to provide the complete, accurate, or lacking information to the manufacturer or distributor. A dealer’s failure to comply with the specific requirements of the manufacturer or distributor for processing a claim may not constitute grounds for denial of the claim or reduction of the amount of compensation paid to the dealer if the dealer presents reasonable documentation or other evidence to substantiate the claim.

A manufacturer or distributor may only audit warranty, sales, or incentive claims for a period of twelve (12) months following payment, or the end of a program which does not exceed one (1) year in length, whichever is later, subject to all of the provisions of this section.

A manufacturer or distributor shall not require documentation for warranty, sales, or incentive claims more than twelve (12) months after the claim was paid or the end of a program which does not exceed one (1) year in length, whichever is later.

Prior to requiring any charge-back, reimbursement, or credit against a future transaction arising out of an audit, the manufacturer or distributor shall submit written notice to the dealer along with a copy of its audit and the detailed reason for each intended charge-back, reimbursement, or credit.

The limitations of this subsection do not apply if the manufacturer or distributor can prove fraud on a claim.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 75, § 2; 1974, ch. 107, § 1; 1978, ch. 182, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 373, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 452, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 2000, ch. 23, § 4, effective February 22, 2000; 2011, ch. 3, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A manufacturer is prohibited from requiring that a franchise dealer submit to an arbitration panel the question of whether the dealer must pay for all or part of the cost of repairing or replacing a defective new motor vehicle.

OAG 87-69

.

190.0461.
Recall of vehicle — Duty of manufacturer or distributor.

In the event a manufacturer or distributor recalls any of its products, the manufacturer or distributor must include within the written notice thereof to vehicle owners and dealers the expected date by which necessary parts and equipment will be available for the correction of the defects necessitating the recall.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 182, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

190.0462.
Manufacturer’s schedule of compensation to be paid to dealers for warranty service and repairs.

Included within the application for a license to engage in business within this state as a manufacturer of motor vehicles must be a schedule specifying the compensation to be paid the manufacturer’s dealers for parts, work and service in connection with warranty service and repairs which shall include compensation for diagnostic work, as well as repair service and labor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 182, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

190.047.
Transfer of motor vehicle sales franchise — Proposal to establish additional dealership or to relocate existing dealership.

Unless a franchise specifically states to the contrary, no franchise or any interest in a franchise may be sold, transferred, or assigned without the approval of the manufacturer or distributor.

A dealer desiring to sell, transfer, or assign all or any portion of his franchise shall submit a written proposal of the sale, transfer, or assignment to the manufacturer or distributor, and approval of the proposal shall not be arbitrarily or unreasonably withheld.

The refusal of the manufacturer or the distributor to approve a proposed sale, transfer, or assignment shall be subject to review by the licensor, if a written application for review is filed with the licensor, with notice to the manufacturer or distributor, within thirty (30) days of the date of the refusal. The refusal shall not be final until the licensor, after a hearing has been held in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B, has determined that the approval was not arbitrarily or unreasonably withheld.

The burden of proof shall be on the dealer to show that the approval of the sale, transfer, or assignment of any interest in the franchise was arbitrarily or unreasonably withheld. Factors to be considered in determining whether the manufacturer or distributor acted arbitrarily or unreasonably shall include whether the basic financial and facility requirements of the franchise will be met by the proposed transfer, sale, or assignment and that the proposed purchaser, transferee, or assignee is capable of operating, managing, and supervising the operation of the business in question.

Failure of the manufacturer or distributor to abide by the final order of the licensor or to continue the franchise in effect pending the final determination of the issue by the licensor shall be cause for the licensor to refuse to issue a subsequent license in the same county or franchise area to an applicant who will be selling the same motor vehicles as the former dealer for the same manufacturer or distributor.

If a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative seeks to:

Enter into a franchise establishing an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility;

Establish an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility under an existing franchise; or

Relocate an existing new motor vehicle dealership facility, within or into a relevant market area where the same line make is then represented,

the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative shall, in writing, first notify the licensor, and each new motor vehicle dealer in the line make in the relevant market area, of the intention to establish an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility, or to establish an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility under an existing franchise, or to relocate an existing new motor vehicle dealership facility within or into that market area. The relevant market area shall be a radius of ten (10) miles around an existing new motor vehicle dealership facility. Within fifteen (15) days of receiving the notice, or within fifteen (15) days after the end of any appeal procedure provided by the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative, any new motor vehicle dealership may file with the licensor a protest to the establishment or relocation of the new motor vehicle dealership facility. When a protest is filed, the licensor shall inform the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative that a timely protest has been filed and that the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory representative shall not establish or relocate the proposed new motor vehicle dealership facility until the licensor has held a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, if the licensor has determined that there is good cause for permitting the new motor vehicle dealership facility. For the purposes of this section, the reopening in a relevant market area of a new motor vehicle dealership that has not been in operation for two (2) years or more shall be deemed the establishment of an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility.

In determining whether good cause has been established for entering into an additional franchise for the same line make, or establishing an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility under an existing franchise, or relocating an existing new motor vehicle dealership facility within or into a relevant market area where the same line make is then represented, the licensor shall take into consideration the existing circumstances, including, but not limited to:

Permanency of the investment;

Whether the new motor vehicle dealer of the same line make in that relevant market area is providing adequate competition and convenient consumer care for the motor vehicles of the line make in the market area, which shall include the adequacy of motor vehicle sales and service facilities, equipment, supply of vehicle parts, and qualified service personnel; and

Growth, or decline in population and new car registrations in the relevant market areas.

In the case of the establishment of an additional new motor vehicle dealership facility under an existing franchise, good cause shall not be found if the additional facility fails to offer a range of service, including, but not limited to sales, service, parts, and financing.

Any parties to a hearing by the licensor concerning the establishing or relocating of a new motor vehicle dealership shall have a right of judicial review of the final order in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

The provisions of this section shall apply to the personal representative, executor, or administrator of the estate of an individual who had an interest in a franchise, or to the guardian or conservator of an individual who has been declared mentally disabled and who has that interest for one (1) year following appointment.

The provisions of this section do not apply to:

The relocation of an existing dealership within that dealer’s area of responsibility contained in its franchise agreement, provided the relocation is not within five (5) miles of a new motor vehicle dealer of the same line make; or

The relocation of an existing new motor vehicle dealership facility to a site that is further away from an existing dealership of the same line make.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 75, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(2); 1982, ch. 141, § 64, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 373, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 111, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 77, effective July 15, 1996.

190.049.
Controversies as to transportation costs and damages of new motor vehicles. [Repealed.]

190.0491.
“Delivery” defined — Dealer’s duties concerning vehicle damaged in transit — Reversion of ownership — Certification to consumer — Failure of manufacturer to indemnify dealer.

“Delivery” of a motor vehicle to a dealer by a manufacturer or distributor for the purposes of this section shall be accomplished by the:

Tender of the motor vehicle and any documents necessary to enable the dealer to obtain title and possession of the motor vehicle at the dealer’s place of business or designated place of delivery, and

The giving of notice of the tender of the motor vehicle and documents to the dealer.

Whenever a motor vehicle is damaged while in transit when the carrier or the means of transportation is designated by the manufacturer or distributor, or whenever a motor vehicle is otherwise damaged prior to delivery to the dealer, the dealer must:

Notify the manufacturer or distributor of the damage within three (3) working days of the occurrence of the delivery of the motor vehicle as defined in subsection (1) of this section; and

Request from the manufacturer or distributor authorization to repair the damages sustained or to replace the parts or accessories damaged.

Notification of damage by the dealer must be by certified mail, with a notice of delivery requested to be returned to the dealer, and shall be presumed to have occurred upon deposit of the notice with the United States Postal Service.

In the event the manufacturer or distributor refuses or fails to authorize repair or replacement of the damage within three (3) working days of notification of damage by the dealer, ownership of the motor vehicle shall revert to the manufacturer or distributor, and the dealer shall incur no obligations, financial or otherwise, for the damage to the motor vehicle. In determining when the notification of the damage by the dealer to the manufacturer or distributor occurs, the date the notice is received by the manufacturer or distributor by the United States Postal Service indicated on the notice of delivery returned to the dealer shall be controlling.

In computing the lapse of three (3) working days under this section, the day of the occurrence of delivery of the motor vehicle to the dealer by the manufacturer or distributor, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, or the day of notification of the damage to the manufacturer or distributor by the dealer, as described in subsection (3) of this section, shall not be included, but the last working day of the period so computed shall be included.

Prior to the sale of any motor vehicle damaged prior to delivery to the dealer as described in subsection (2) of this section, excluding damage to glass, tires, and bumpers when replaced by identical manufacturer’s original equipment and any damage not exceeding six percent (6%) of the sticker price of the vehicle, the occurrence and extent of the damage must be disclosed by the dealer to the consumer, and upon repair of the damage sustained, or replacement of the parts or accessories damaged, the manufacturer and/or dealer, must certify to the consumer that the motor vehicle has been repaired or remanufactured to the manufacturer’s standards; if the dealer makes the certification he shall be indemnified by the manufacturer. Upon this certification, liability for any concealed damages then remaining with the motor vehicle shall lie with the manufacturer.

Whenever a motor vehicle is damaged resulting in repairs, for items other than wheels, tires, or glass, that exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) after delivery to the dealer by the manufacturer or distributor, as defined in subsection (1) of this section, but before sale by the dealer to the consumer, the occurrence and extent of the damage must be disclosed by the dealer to the consumer prior to a sale, and upon repair of the damage sustained, or replacement of parts or accessories damaged, the dealer must certify to the consumer that this motor vehicle has been repaired or remanufactured according to the manufacturer’s standards. Upon this certification, liability for any concealed damages then remaining with the motor vehicle shall lie with the dealer.

Notwithstanding the terms of any franchise agreement, it shall be a violation of this section for any new motor vehicle manufacturer to fail to indemnify and hold harmless its franchised dealers against any judgment or settlement agreed to in writing by the manufacturer for damages, including, but not limited to, court costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees of the new motor vehicle dealer, arising out of complaints, claims, or lawsuits including, but not limited to, strict liability, negligence, misrepresentation, warranty (express or implied), or rescission of the sale as is defined in KRS

355.2-608

, to the extent that the judgment or settlement agreed to in writing by the manufacturer relates to the alleged defective or negligent manufacture, assembly, or design of new motor vehicles, parts, or accessories or other functions by the manufacturer, beyond the control of the dealer.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 182, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 35, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 373, § 12, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 111, § 8, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 23, § 5, effective Feburary 22, 2000; 2017 ch. 139, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

190.050.
Local and general advisory committees, appointment of — Duties.

The licensor may appoint annually one (1) or more local advisory committees and one (1) general advisory committee, each consisting of not more than nine (9) members. The committees upon request of the licensor may advise and assist the licensor in the administration of this section. The members of said committees shall receive no compensation for their services or expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 161, § 5, effective May 18, 1956.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The department of motor transportation (now department of vehicle regulation) can rely upon the advice given to the commissioner by the advisory committee as such advice would constitute good cause for issuing or revoking salesmen’s licenses.

OAG 64-862

.

190.053.
Citation of suspected violators.

If a licensee is found to be violating any of the provisions of this chapter, or any administrative regulation promulgated by the commission pursuant thereto, or is found to be permitting any of its salesmen to violate any of the provisions of this chapter, or any administrative regulation promulgated by the commission pursuant thereto, the commission may, upon complaint or upon its own motion, issue its order to a licensee notifying it to appear before the commission at a fixed time and place, at which time and place the commission shall have a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the commission is satisfied, after a hearing, that the licensee has violated or refused to observe any of the provisions of this chapter, or any order or administrative regulation of the commission, or has permitted any of its salesmen to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any order or administrative regulation promulgated by the commission pursuant thereto, the commission may suspend or revoke the license of the licensee. The renewal by the commission of any license shall not be construed to be a waiver or condonement of any violation which occurred prior to renewal and shall not prevent subsequent proceedings against the licensee for the violation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, § 16; 1982, ch. 374, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 452, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 318, § 78, effective July 15, 1996.

190.057.
Hearings — Amendment of final order.

Hearings under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

A final order may be withdrawn, set aside, or amended, if action is taken between the date of the rendition of the final order and the expiration of the time for appeal or until an appeal has been taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 175, §§ 14, 15; 1982, ch. 374, § 9, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 452, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 111, § 7, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 79, effective July 15, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/96). This section was amended by 1996 Ky. Acts chs. 111 and 318 which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts ch. 318, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.